src/babyfst.xfscript
define Assimilations NAssimilation
       .o.	     BoundBilabialization
       .o.	     BoundRegressiveT
       .o.	     Lateralization
       .o.           InfixalTAssimilation
       .o.           InfixalTEmphasis
       .o.           ShinAlveolar
       .o.           BoundSibilantShin
       .o.           MAlveolarization
       .o.           MAlveolarizationK
       .o.           BoundAssibilation
       .o.           LTtoSS
       .o.           RAssimilation
       .o.           RAssibilation
       .o.           BoundGemination
       .o.           BoundAssimilation
       .o.           ŠAlveolarization ;


! ==============================================================
! General dissimilations
!
! Note that dissimilations must be composed before assimilations
! to avoid bleeding, e.g. irubma -> irumma -> irunma.
! The bleeding should not occur vice versa, as the assimilation 
! should just produce the initial state for dissimilation, e.g.
! inaddin -> ( inandin | inamdin ) -> inaddin
!
! DissimGeminates:    inaddin -> inandin
! DissimGeminatesM:   inaddin -> inamdin
! ==============================================================

! @ MB|SB|NB|LB (Buccellati 1996: 39)
define DissimGeminates b (->) m || _ b
       .o.             m (->) n || _ m
       .o.             d (->) n || _ d
       .o.             z (->) n || _ z
       .o.             g (->) n || _ g ;

! @ SB|NB|LB (Oracc)
define DissimGeminatesM b (->) n || _ b
       .o.		d (->) m || _ d
       .o.		z (->) m || _ z 
       .o.		g (->) m || _ g ; 

define Dissimilations DissimGeminates .o. DissimGeminatesM ;


! ==============================================================
! Metatheses
! ==============================================================

! @ OB|MB|SB|NB|LB (Buccellati 1996:233)
define Metatheses [ š i t ] (->) [ t i š ] || .#. _
       .o.        [ z i t ] (->) [ t i z ] || .#. _
       .o.        [ s i t ] (->) [ t i s ] || .#. _
       .o.        [ ṣ i t ] (->) [ t i ṣ ] || .#. _ ;

! ==============================================================
! Intonation
! ==============================================================

define Intonation a (->) â || _ .#.
       .o.        i (->) i || _ .#.
       .o.        u (->) û || _ .#.
       .o.        e (->) ê || _ .#. ;

define MALengthening [a|â] (->) ā || _ %> [ m a .#. ]
       .o.	     [u|û] (->) ū || _ %> [ m a .#. ]
       .o.	     [i|î] (->) ī || _ %> [ m a .#. ] 
       .o.           [e|ê] (->) ē || _ %> [ m a .#. ] ;

! ==============================================================
! Normalizations
! ==============================================================

define NormalizeYod Yod (->) j .o. Yod (->) y ;

define Normalization NormalizeYod ;


! ==============================================================
! Removal of meta-characters and illegal sequences caused by
! overgeneration or imperfect grammatical definitions
! ==============================================================

define RemoveMorphemeBoundaries [ %< | %> ] -> 0 ;

define MarkIllegal [[ y Char* j ] |
                    [ j Char* y ] |
		    [ ♀ | ♂ | Ṫ ] |
                    [ u i ] |
		    [ ū i C - n ]
                    [ ā a ] | [ a ā ] | 
                    [ ī i ] | [ i ī ] |
                    [ ē e ] | [ e ē ] | 
                    [ ū u ] | [ u ū ] |
		    [ V VCont ] | [ VCont V ] |
		    [ VLong VCont ] | [ VCont VLong ] |
		    [ VLong VLong ] | [ VCont VCont ] |
		    [ C C C ] ] -> "^" 
   .o.              [ C C ] -> "^" || _ .#. 
   .o.              [ C C ] -> "^" || .#. _ ; 

define FilterIllegal [ ? - "^" ]* ;

def Cleanup RemoveMorphemeBoundaries
   .o.      MarkIllegal 
   .o.      FilterIllegal ;


! ==============================================================
! Compose regular expression
! ==============================================================

regex  [ MorphologyNouns | MorphologyVerbs | Names | Other ] 
   .o. Morphophonemes
   .o. Syncope
   .o. Testi
   .o. VerbalAlternation
   .o. Contraction
   .o. FeminineRules
   .o. UtGemination
   .o. RemoveMimation
   .o. VowelHarmonyBab
   .o. VowelHarmony
   .o. Dissimilations
   .o. Assimilations
   .o. Metatheses
   .o. Intonation
   .o. MALengthening
   .o. Normalization
   .o. Cleanup ;

set flag-is-epsilon OFF

! FOMA FST
save stack akkadian.fomabin

! HFST FST
! save stack akkadian.hfst
